Utah statutes.
16-16-821.   Right of director or committee member to information.
A director or a member of a committee appointed under Section 16-16-817 may
obtain, inspect, and copy all information regarding the state of activities
and financial condition of the limited cooperative association and other
information regarding the activities of the association if the information is
reasonably related to the performance of the director's duties as director or
the committee member's duties as a member of the committee.  Information
obtained in accordance with this section may not be used in any manner that
would violate any duty of or to the association.
